Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2910.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 34-36.1-1.02 and 34-36.1-1.03 of the General Laws in Chapter 34-
36.1 entitled "Condominium Law" are hereby amended to read as follows:
34-36.1-1.02. Applicability.
(a)(1) This chapter applies to all condominiums created within this state after July 1, 1982,
except that any condominium created within this state prior to July 1, 1982, may voluntarily accept
the provisions of this chapter in lieu of the provisions under which it was originally organized.
Acceptance shall be evidenced by an agreement in writing executed by and in behalf of the
condominium association and by all of the owners of all of the individual condominium units within
the condominium, in which agreement it is clearly stated that they all accept the provisions of this
chapter in lieu of those in the statute under which the condominium was organized and wish to be
governed in the future by the provisions of this chapter. The agreement shall be recorded in the
land evidence records of each and every town or city where all or any part of the land in the
condominium concerned may be located and shall become effective when first so recorded. The
acceptance shall only apply to the governance of the condominium concerned as to all matters
which are prospective or executory in nature; and nothing herein shall be deemed to abrogate,
amend, limit, effect, or impair the continued effectiveness, legality, or validity of all actions
lawfully taken by or in behalf of the condominium prior to the effective date of the acceptance,
including, but without limitation, the condominium declaration and all amendments thereto, the by-
laws of the condominium and/or of its association, all deeds, mortgages, leases, and any further

documents affecting the titles or rights of unit owners, or of the condominium or the prior lawful
acts or deeds of any kind, of the condominium association, its officers, directors, or members.
(2) Sections 34-36.1-1.05 (separate titles and taxation), 34-36.1-1.06 (applicability of local
ordinances, regulations, and building codes), 34-36.1-1.07 (eminent domain), 34-36.1-2.03
(construction and validity of declaration and bylaws), 34-36.1-2.04 (description of units), 34-36.1-
2.19(b) (mortgage approval), 34-36.1-3.02(a)(1) — (6) and (11) — (17) (powers of unit owners’
association), 34-36.1-3.06(c) — (d) (bylaws), 34-36.1-3.08 (meetings and notice), 34-36.1-3.08
(meetings), 34-36.1-3.11 (tort and contract liability), 34-36.1-3.13(d) and (k) (unit owner
responsibility for master policy deductibles), 34-36.1-3.16 (lien for assessments), 34-36.1-3.18
(association records), 34-36.1-4.09 (resale of units), and 34-36.1-4.17 (effect of violation on rights
of action; attorney’s fees), § 34-36.1-3.20 (enforcement of declaration, bylaws and rules), and 34-
36.1-1.03 (definitions), to the extent necessary in construing any of those sections, apply to all
condominiums created in this state before July 1, 1982; but those sections apply only with respect
to events and circumstances occurring after July 1, 1982, and do not invalidate existing provisions
of the declaration, bylaws, plats, or plans of those condominiums.
(3) A condominium created as an additional phase by amendment of a condominium
created prior to July 1, 1982, if the original declaration contemplated the amendment, shall be
deemed to be a condominium created prior to July 1, 1982; provided, however, the provisions of
subdivision (a)(2) shall apply as defined therein.
(4) Section 34-36.1-3.21 (foreclosure of condominium lien) applies, with respect to all
condominiums created in this state prior to June 19, 1991, only with respect to events and
circumstances occurring after June 18, 1991, does not invalidate existing provisions of the
declarations, bylaws, plats, or plans of those condominiums, and applies in all respects to all
condominiums created in this state after June 18, 1991.
(b) The provisions of the Condominium Ownership Act, chapter 36 of this title, do not
apply to condominiums created after July 1, 1982, and do not invalidate any amendment to the
declaration, bylaws, plats, and plans of any condominium created before July 1, 1982, if the
amendment would be permitted by this chapter. The amendment must be adopted in conformity
with the procedures and requirements specified by those instruments and by chapter 36 of this title.
If the amendment grants to any person any rights, powers, or privileges permitted by this chapter,
all correlative obligations, liabilities, and restrictions in this chapter also apply to that person.
(c) This chapter does not apply to condominiums or units located outside this state, but the
public offering statement provisions (§§ 34-36.1-4.02 — 34-36.1-4.07) apply to all contracts for
the disposition thereof signed in this state by any party unless exempt under § 34-36.1-4.01(b).
LC005572 - Page 2 of 9

34-36.1-1.03. Definitions.
In the declaration and bylaws, unless specifically provided otherwise or the context
otherwise requires, and in this chapter:
(1) “Affiliate of a declarant” means any person who controls, is controlled by, or is under
common control with a declarant.
(i) A person “controls” a declarant if the person:
(A) Is a general partner, officer, director, or employer of the declarant,
(B) Directly or indirectly or acting in concert with one or more other persons, or through
one or more subsidiaries, owns, controls, holds with power to vote, or holds proxies representing,
more than twenty percent (20%) of the voting interest in the declarant,
(C) Controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors of the declarant, or
(D) Has contributed more than twenty percent (20%) of the capital of the declarant.
(ii) A person “is controlled by” a declarant if the declarant:
(A) Is a general partner, officer, director, or employer of the person,
(B) Directly or indirectly or acting in concert with one or more other persons, or through
one or more subsidiaries, owns, controls, holds with power to vote, or holds proxies representing,
more than twenty percent (20%) of the voting interest in the person,
(C) Controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors of the person, or
(D) Has contributed more than twenty percent (20%) of the capital of the person.
(iii) Control does not exist if the powers described in this subdivision are held solely as
security for an obligation and are not exercised.
(2) “Allocated interests” means the undivided interest in the common elements, the
common expense liability, and votes in the association allocated to each unit.
(3) “Association” or “unit owners’ association” means the unit owners’ association
organized under § 34-36.1-3.01.
(4) “Common elements” means all portions of a condominium other than the units.
(5) “Common expenses” means expenditures made by or financial liabilities of the
association, together with any allocations to reserves.
(6) “Common expense liability” means the liability for common expenses allocated to each
unit pursuant to § 34-36.1-2.07.
(7) "Conditions survey" means an assessment of a condominium’s common elements and
any additional elements listed in GSA 1204-14 conducted by an engineer, architect, or building
inspector licensed in the State of Rhode Island with documented experience in analyzing the
structural components of residential communities for the purposes of identifying repairs or
LC005572 - Page 3 of 9

replacements needed to address potential safety hazards and to preserve structural integrity.
(7)(8)(i) “Condominium” means real estate, portions of which are designated for separate
ownership and the remainder of which is designated for common ownership solely by the owners
of those portions. Real estate is not a condominium unless the undivided interests in the common
elements are vested in the unit owners.
(ii) Provided that each unit owner has a vested, undivided interest in the common elements
greater that 0.0 percent, no minimum percentage interest in the common elements is otherwise
required by this chapter.
(8)(9) “Conversion building” means a building that at any time before creation of the
condominium was occupied wholly or partially by persons other than purchasers and persons who
occupy with the consent of purchasers.
(9)(10) “Declarant” means any person or group of persons acting in concert who:
(i) As part of a common promotional plan, offers to dispose of his, her or its interest in a
unit not previously disposed of; or
(ii) Reserves or succeeds to any special declarant right.
(10)(11) “Declaration” means any instruments, however denominated, that create a
condominium, and any amendments to those instruments.
(11)(12) “Development rights” means any right or combination of rights reserved by a
declarant in the declaration to:
(A) Add real estate to a condominium,
(B) Create units, common elements, or limited common elements within a condominium,
(C) Subdivide units or convert units into common elements, or
(D) Withdraw real estate from a condominium.
(12)(13) “Person with a disability” means any person who is unable to engage in any
substantial gainful activity by reason of any medically determinable physical or mental impairment
which can be expected to result in death or has lasted or can be expected to last for a continuous
period of not less than twelve (12) months or any person having an impairment of mobility or vision
which is expected to be of at least twelve (12) months duration, and is a substantial impediment to
his or her ability to live independently.
(13)(14) “Dispose” or “disposition” means a voluntary transfer to a purchaser of any legal
or equitable interest in a unit, but does not include the transfer or release of a security interest.
(14)(15) “Executive board” means the body, regardless of name, designated in the
declaration to act on behalf of the association.
(15)(16) [Deleted by P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 80, and P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 80 which enacted
LC005572 - Page 4 of 9

identical amendments to this section.]
(16)(17) “Identifying number” means a symbol or address that identifies only one unit in a
condominium.
(17)(18) “Land only units” shall mean units designated as land only units on the plats and
plans which units may be comprised entirely or partially of unimproved real property and the air
space above the real property. The boundaries of a land only unit are to be described pursuant to §
34-36.1-2.05(a)(5). Land only units may, but need not, contain a physical structure. The declaration
may provide for the conversion of land only units to other types of units and/or common elements
provided the conversion shall be effective only upon the recording of an amendment to the
declaration which amendment will include new plats and plans identifying any portion of the land
only unit converted to another type of unit and/or common element.
(18)(19) “Leasehold condominium” means a condominium in which all or a portion of the
real estate is subject to a lease the expiration or termination of which will terminate the
condominium or reduce its size.
(19)(20) “Limited common element” means a portion of the common elements allocated
by the declaration or by operation of § 34-36.1-2.02(2) or (4) for the exclusive use of one or more
but fewer than all of the units.
(20)(21) “Master association” means an organization described in § 34-36.1-2.20, whether
or not it is also an association described in § 34-36.1-3.01.
(21)(22) “Offering” means any advertisement, inducement, solicitation, or attempt to
encourage any person to acquire any interest in a unit, other than as security for an obligation. An
advertisement in a newspaper or other periodical of general circulation, or in any broadcast medium
to the general public, of a condominium not located in this state, is not an offering if the
advertisement states that an offering may be made only in compliance with the law of the
jurisdiction in which the condominium is located.
(22)(23) “Person” means a natural person, corporation, business trust, estate, trust,
partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision or agency, or other
legal or commercial entity. (In the case of a land trust, however, “person” means the beneficiary of
the trust rather than the trust or the trustee.)
(23)(24) “Purchaser” means any person, other than a declarant or a person in the business
of selling real estate for his or her own account, who by means of a voluntary transfer acquires a
legal or equitable interest in a unit other than:
(i) A leasehold interest including renewal options of less than twenty (20) years, or
(ii) As security for an obligation.
LC005572 - Page 5 of 9

(24)(25) “Real estate” means any leasehold or other estate or interest in, over, or under
land, including structures, fixtures, and other improvements and interests which by custom, usage,
or law pass with a conveyance of land though not described in the contract of sale or instrument of
conveyance. “Real estate” includes parcels with or without upper or lower boundaries, and spaces
that may be filled with air or water.
(26) "Reserves study" means an evaluation of the reserves required for future anticipated
major repairs and replacements of the common elements of a condominium and states
(i) The normal and estimated remaining useful life of each identified component;
(ii) The estimated cost of repair or replacement of each identified component;
(iii) The estimated annual reserve amount necessary to accomplish any identified future
repair or replacement; and
(iv) The quantity or size of each identified component using the appropriate measurement,
such as unit amount, square footage, or cubic feet.
(27) "Reserves study update" means, for the common elements since the prior reserve study
was completed within the previous five (5) years, a study that:
(i) Revises replacement costs, remaining life, and useful life estimates;
(ii) Analyzes work performed and amounts spent; and
(iii) Identifies whether any maintenance contracts are in place.
(25)(28) “Residential purposes” means use for dwelling or recreational purposes, or both.
(26)(29) “Special declarant rights” means rights reserved for the benefit of a declarant to:
(i) Complete improvements indicated on plats and plans filed with the declaration, (§ 34-
36.1-2.09),
(ii) To exercise any development right, (§ 34-36.1-2.10),
(iii) To maintain sales offices, management offices, signs advertising the condominium,
and models, (§ 34-36.1-2.15),
(iv) To use easements through the common elements for the purpose of making
improvements within the condominium or within real estate which may be added to the
condominium, (§ 34-36.1-2.16),
(v) To make the condominium part of a larger condominium or a planned community, (§
34-36.1-2.21),
(vi) To make the condominium subject to a master association, (§ 34-36.1-2.20),
(vii) Or to appoint or remove any officer of the association or any master association or
any executive board member during any period of declarant control, (§ 34-36.1-3.03(d)).
(27)(30) “Time share” means a right to occupy a unit or any of several units during five (5)
LC005572 - Page 6 of 9

or more separated time periods over a period of at least five (5) years, including renewal options,
whether or not coupled with an estate or interest in a condominium or a specified portion thereof.
(28)(31) “Unit” means a physical portion of the condominium designated for separate
ownership or occupancy, the boundaries of which are described pursuant to § 34-36.1-2.05(a)(5).
(29)(32) “Unit owner” means a declarant or other person who owns a unit, or a lessee of a
unit in a leasehold condominium whose lease expires simultaneously with any lease, the expiration
or termination of which will remove the unit from the condominium, but does not include a person
having an interest in a unit solely as security for an obligation.
SECTION 2. Chapter 34-36.1 of the General Laws entitled "Condominium Law" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
34-36.1-3.24. Applicability of structural common element study requirement for
condominium associations.
(a) Any condominium twenty (20) years old or older shall commission a conditions survey
that includes a timeline by which such repairs and replacements should be completed and shall
identify areas that should be physically designated as safety hazards with access prohibited. The
conditions survey and a plan developed by the executive board to address needed repairs and
replacements shall be shared with all unit owners upon its completion.
(b) Every declarant of a condominium association shall commission and conduct both a
conditions survey as described in § 34-36.1-1.02 and an initial reserves study within six (6) months
after completion of its final phase of construction.
(c) An association that has not commissioned an initial reserves study or has not conducted
one within five (5) years shall conduct a reserves study within twelve (12) months of the effective
date of this legislation unless they are conducting a conditions survey. An association conducting
a conditions survey that has not had a reserves study done within five (5) years shall conduct a
reserves study at least at the time the repairs and replacements identified by the conditions survey
are completed.
(d) Every condominium association shall conduct a reserves study or a reserves study
update with engineer review every five (5) years after its initial reserves study.
(e) All reserve studies shall be conducted, certified, and dated by a reserves study specialist
(RS ™) certified by the Community Associations Institute or a professional engineer (PE) licensed
in the state. All reserve studies shall be prepared in conformance with the currently available
Reserve Study Standards of the Community Associations Institute or similar standards by another
recognized national organization.
(f) The most recent reserve study shall be shared with all unit owners upon completion and
LC005572 - Page 7 of 9

shall be included in the sales certificate for new unit owners within sixty (60) days of its availability
to unit owners.
(g) The executive board shall oversee the development of a plan that addresses the short
term recommendations of the reserve study with respect to the association’s priorities, funding, and
timelines. Such plan shall be shared with all unit owners. The executive board shall subsequently
engage in a strategic planning process that includes the reserve study’s recommendations in
addition to its other goals and objectives. The strategic plan shall be shared with all unit owners
when completed, the executive board shall report on its progress to all unit owners on an annual
basis, and it shall be updated at least every five (5) years.
(h) It is the responsibility of the association’s governing executive board to identify and
obtain funds needed to address any immediate repairs and replacements identified by a conditions
survey. Unless the association’s declaration or bylaws state otherwise, the unit owners of the
association, by a majority vote of a quorum, may determine the source of these finances which
could include reserves and/or assessments and/or loans, and/or amendment of budget through
standard procedure.
(i) The association must maintain a reserves account, separate from the operating account,
that shall only be used to conduct necessary work as identified in the conditions survey, reserves
studies, and unexpected needed structural repairs to common elements. The reserves account may
also fund the required reserves studies. The reserves account shall be funded by at least fifteen
percent (15%) of the monthly assessment fee by January 1, 2027 and may be supplemented by
assessments as necessary to maintain the structural integrity of the association’s infrastructure.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2028.
========
LC005572
========
LC005572 - Page 8 of 9